District of Columbia statutes.
34-1264.01

Obscenity.

The cable operator and all users of the cable system shall comply with all federal laws regarding obscenity on cable television and all District laws regarding obscenity.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1401
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334